Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.260

Increase in certain presently payable death benefits authorized.

All benefits presently payable pursuant to the provisions of RCW 41.20.085 which are not related to the amount of current salary attached to the position held by the deceased member, shall be increased annually in the same manner and to the same extent as provided for pursuant to RCW 41.26.250.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 190 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 35.]